Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2203
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska State Capitol Preservation and Restoration Act:

(1) Administrator means the State Capitol Administrator;

(2) Commission means the Nebraska Capitol Commission; and

(3) Office means the Office of the Nebraska Capitol Commission.

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 3.